Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.110

Referee's proposed report—Copies—Objections, etc.—Request for hearing—Final report—Additional items to be filed—Exception—Copies.

(1) Within twenty days after the conclusion of a trial before a referee appointed under RCW 4.48.010, unless a later time is agreed to by the parties, the referee shall mail to each party a copy of the referee's proposed written report. The proposed report shall contain the findings of fact and conclusions of law by the referee and the judgment of the referee.

(2) Within ten days after receipt of the copy of the proposed report, any party may serve written objections and suggested modifications or corrections to the proposed report on the referee and the other parties. The referee shall without delay consider the objections and suggestions and prepare a final written report. If requested by any party, the referee shall conduct a hearing on the proposed report and any suggested corrections or modifications before preparing the final written report.

(3) Upon completion of the final written report, the referee shall file with the clerk of the superior court:

(a) Copies of all original papers in the action filed with the referee;

(b) Exhibits offered and received or rejected during the trial;

(c) The transcript of the proceedings in the trial; and

(d) The final written report containing the findings of fact and conclusions of law by the referee and the judgment of the referee.

(4) The presiding judge of the superior court may allow the referee to file the final written report under subsection (3) of this section without any of the items listed in subsection (3) (a) through (c) of this section. However, the presiding judge shall require the referee to file those items if a timely notice of appeal of the judgment is filed.

(5) When the referee files the written report under subsection (3) of this section, the referee shall also mail to each party a copy of the report.

[ 1984 c 258 s 521.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.